Hawaii statutes.
§36-28 Transfers from state highway fund
for central service expenses. Except as hereinafter provided, and
notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, there shall be deducted from
time to time by the director of finance, for the purpose of defraying the
prorated estimate of central service expenses of government in relation to the
state highway fund created by section 248-8, five per cent of all receipts and
deposits in the fund, after deducting therefrom any amounts pledged, charged,
or encumbered for the payment of bonds or interest thereon during the current
year, from which receipts or deposits no deduction of five per cent has been
previously made, which deductions shall be transferred to the general fund of
the State and become general realizations of the State. The state department
of transportation shall cooperate with the director of finance in effecting
these transfers. [L 1957, c 69, §2; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §§14, 26; am L 1963,
c 114, §1; Supp, §132-16.5; HRS §36-28]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next